California statutes. Water Code
The board may, by order entered in its minutes, postpone or discontinue from time to time the calling of the semiannual installments or any of them for such periods of time as it deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8941.

Any owner or holder of lands within the boundaries of the drainage district whose lands are subject to the lien of assessment number six or supplemental assessment number six levied in connection with project number six may present to any officer authorized by law to collect such assessments, or any part thereof, warrants of the district now, or hereafter to be, issued in connection with project number six in payment of his assessment, or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8942.

Any officer mentioned in the next preceding section shall accept such warrants so presented or tendered in payment of the assessment, or any part thereof, at the face value of the warrant or warrants so presented, plus accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8943.

All warrants when received by any officer authorized by law to receive them shall be by him transmitted to the Controller who shall give the officer a receipt for the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8944.

The Controller shall, upon demand of the board, cancel the warrants and credit the face value thereof, plus the accrued interest thereon to the date of the tender of the warrants in payment of assessments to the fund upon which the warrants were originally drawn and charge the fund with the accrued interest. Thereupon the Controller shall notify the State Treasurer of the cancellation and the State Treasurer shall make the proper entry in his books.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8945.

Partial payments on any tract in excess of any regular installment amount shall be credited to the payment of the principal amount of the assessment upon that tract thereby reducing the interest that would thereafter accrue upon that tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8946.

Any and all partial payments of principal may, and upon request of the person making payment shall, be credited to the amounts charged against the tract by reason of benefits other than flood control until such charges have been paid in full and thereafter to the amounts charged against the tract by reason of flood control benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District Fund [8950. - 8952.]

8950.

All money collected upon sales or otherwise shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county in which the land is situated, and the money, together with all other money collected by the county treasurer shall, within one month after its receipt by the county treasurer, be by him deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the drainage district in a fund which is continued in existence and known as the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District Fund, specifying the name and number of the assessment from which the money was derived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8951.

The money in the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District Fund shall be paid out upon warrants of the Controller, and the Controller shall issue warrants upon the funds whenever drafts of the board are presented to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8952.

The State Treasurer shall pay such Controllers warrants when there is sufficient money in the fund of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Funds of Defunct Sacramento Drainage District [8953. - 8953.]

8953.

All money collected by any of the county treasurers of the State as assessments of the defunct Sacramento drainage district, and unexpended in the hands of the county treasurers, shall vest in the drainage district, and the county treasurers of the State shall pay the money over to the board for the benefit of the drainage district, and the money, when paid over to the board, shall be expended by it for general administrative purposes of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Warrants [8955. - 8982.]

8955.

All money collected from assessments shall be paid out only on warrants issued for works or other expenses covered by the assessment from which the money was derived, to the end that all money raised by assessment upon any of the lands embraced in the drainage district, shall be expended only for works of reclamation or other expenses, beneficial to the lands so assessed, and for the payment of warrants issued for the construction of the works and other expenses for which the assessment was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8956.

Each warrant shall designate the name and number of the assessment from which it is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8957.

Drafts of the board may be presented to the Controller and warrants drawn against the funds to be raised by an assessment as soon as the board has passed its order or resolution for the levy of the assessment and appointed the assessors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8958.

In case there are not sufficient funds applicable thereto for the payment of the warrants when presented to the State Treasurer, he shall indorse on the warrants the date of presentation and register the same, and thereafter the warrants shall bear interest at the rate of 7 per cent per annum, and shall be paid in the order of their registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8959.

All such warrants shall be considered as contracts in writing for the payment of money, and the period prescribed for the commencement of an action based upon any such warrants, or connected therewith, is four years from the date of the first publication of the notice specifying the warrants published by the State Treasurer pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8960.

No statute of limitations shall be deemed to have run against any action upon or affecting any warrant drawn against any assessment under this part by reason of the lapse of time during which funds adequate for the payment of the outstanding warrants against the assessment were not available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8961.

The warrants shall, at any time within the period of four years, be received in payment of any assessment for work or expenses for which the warrants were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8962.

The board may, at its option, at any time before payment of any warrant renew it upon application of the owner or holder thereof by an indorsement thereon of the fact and date of the renewal and notice thereof to the State Treasurer and Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8963.

Whenever there is sufficient money in the treasury applicable to the payment of any outstanding warrants of the drainage district, the State Treasurer shall give notice that there is money in the treasury to pay certain warrants, giving their numbers in the order of their registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8964.

The notice shall be published for 10 days in one newspaper published in the City of Stockton and one published in the City of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8965.

After the last publication of the notice the warrants therein mentioned cease to bear interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8966.

The board shall designate a paper in each of the cities of Stockton and Sacramento which shall be the official papers of the drainage district for the purpose of the publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8967.

All warrants of the drainage district when received by the board, Department of Finance, the respective county treasurers or any other officer authorized by law to accept them, for the cancellation or retirement thereof or in payment of assessments, shall be transmitted by the board, department, or officer to the Controller who shall give the board, department, or officer a receipt for the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8968.

The Controller upon demand by the board shall cancel the warrants and credit the face value thereof, plus accrued interest thereon to the date of the tender of the warrants to the board, department or officer receiving them, to the fund upon which the warrants were originally drawn and charge the fund with the accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8969.

The Controller shall notify the State Treasurer of the cancellation and the State Treasurer shall then make the proper entries in his books.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8970.

Whenever any warrant drawn by the Controller upon the State Treasurer as provided in this chapter has been presented to the State Treasurer and not paid for want of funds and has not been registered by the State Treasurer and bears interest as provided in this chapter, the Controller shall at any time, on presentation of the warrant to him for that purpose, certify on the warrant, over his signature, the amount of interest accrued thereon to that date, specifying the date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8971.

When the State Treasurer pays a warrant he shall, in addition to the amount for which the warrant was drawn, pay the interest accrued thereon as certified to by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8972.

Whenever any unpaid, outstanding and interest-bearing warrant drawn by the Controller upon the State Treasurer as provided in this chapter is presented to the board by the owner or holder thereof for the purpose of having two or more warrants issued to him in lieu thereof, the board shall present the warrant properly indorsed to the Controller for credit to the fund upon which it was originally drawn together with a claim on the Controller setting forth the following:

(a) The number and denomination of the warrant to be credited.

(b) The number of substituted warrants, and denomination of each, to be issued in lieu thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8973.

The sum of the substituted warrants shall equal the principal amount of the original warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8974.

The Controller shall credit the original warrant to the fund upon which it was originally drawn and shall prepare and issue warrants in accordance with the claim so presented showing thereon that the substituted warrants are issued in lieu of warrant No.____ (giving the warrant number of the original warrant) and also showing the date of issuance and date of registration of the original warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8975.

When, upon presentation to the State Treasurer, payment can not be made for want of funds the State Treasurer shall register the warrants as of the date of registration of the original warrant and the substituted warrants shall bear interest from the original date of registration at the rate of 7 per cent per annum as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8976.

The Department of Finance may, out of any funds of the State which it is authorized by law to invest, purchase at their face value and invest in any warrants of the drainage district drawn by the Controller as provided in this part and payable out of any assessment levied or to be levied by the board upon lands within the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8977.

The Department of Finance may exchange any warrants purchased pursuant to the next preceding section for other warrants drawn against the same assessment, and sell all or any part of the warrants so purchased or taken in exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8978.

All such exchanges or sales of warrants shall be effected without loss to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8979.

All warrants purchased or acquired by exchange by the Department of Finance shall be registered by the State Treasurer, unless already registered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8980.

The warrants shall be payable with interest in their proper order of registration, as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8981.

The warrants shall, unless sold or exchanged, be held by the Department of Finance until paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8982.

Upon payment of the warrants the proceeds thereof shall be returned into the fund out of which the purchase or investment was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Claims [8990. - 8991.]

8990.

If any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district, municipal corporation, private corporation, association or person has since February 28, 1928, or shall hereafter, advance or expend any sum of money to be applied upon, and in aid of the completion of, any work of new construction called for by the provisions of the flood control plan of the State as in effect February 28, 1928, or as amended after August 14, 1931, the sum advanced, or a specified portion thereof agreed upon, may in the discretion of the board, be determined to be a proper charge against the particular work of construction for which the money was advanced and the party advancing it may, in the discretion of the board, have a claim against the drainage district for the amount, or specified portion thereof, without interest, payable as and when moneys are made available by law for defraying the cost of the particular work for which the sum was originally advanced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

8991.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Districts and Persons Within Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District [8995. - 9048.]



  ARTICLE 1. Flood Control Works, Purchases and Compensation [8995. - 9006.]

8995.

Any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district, or municipal corporation, wholly or partly within the drainage district, may, with the permission of the board, acquire by grant or eminent domain or otherwise, any right of way or other easement included in any of the plans for controlling the flood waters of the Sacramento and San Joaquin rivers or their tributaries to be carried out by the board pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8996.

The right of way or other easement acquired pursuant to the next preceding section shall be required by the plans of the reclamation, levee, or drainage district or municipal corporation for the consummation of its purposes as authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8997.

Any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district or municipal corporation, wholly or partly within the drainage district may with the permission of the board, construct levees, cuts, canals or gates required to complete any by-pass forming part of the plans to be carried out by the board, or to complete any part of any by-pass which may in the judgment of the board be safely and economically constructed as a separate unit or portion of the plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8998.

The title to any such right of way or other easement or levees, cuts, canals or gates shall be conveyed to the drainage district upon compensation being made for the cost thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8999.

If any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district, municipal corporation, or person within the drainage district, with the consent of the board, provides or leaves any land for a by-pass, waterway, storage basin or sump for the purpose of complying with the plans to be carried out by the board, or for carrying out in whole or in part any of the plans or works adopted by it or erects any levee along the by-pass or waterway, storage basin or sump, the by-pass, waterway, storage basin, sump, and levee shall be considered as a part of the work to be done pursuant to the provisions of this part and proper compensation shall be made for the right of way or easement through, over and upon the by-pass, waterway, storage basin or sump and for the actual reasonable cost of construction of the levees, cuts, canals or gates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9000.

When the compensation has been made, the reclamation district, levee district, drainage district, municipal corporation, or person shall convey to the drainage district a perpetual easement in, over and upon the by-pass, storage basin, sump or levee for all purposes necessary to accomplish the plans to be carried out by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

Any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district, municipal corporation or person which does any of the following, with the consent of the board has a claim against the drainage district for the reasonable value of the rights of way, levees, cuts, canals or gates that are involved:

(a) Expends any sum of money in the acquisition of rights of way or other easements, or in the construction of levees, cuts, canals or gates.

(b) Conveys the rights of way, easements, levees, cuts, canals or gates to the drainage district.

(c) Allows any land to be used for the purpose of a by-pass, waterway, storage basin, or sump to comply with the plans to be carried out by the board.

(d) Constructs levees along any line of any by-pass, or storage basin and conveys a perpetual easement therein to the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

An easement shall be levied upon the lands in the drainage district benefited thereby so that the claim may be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

In lieu of levying an assessment pursuant to Section 9002 the cost of the claim may be included as one of the items in any assessment that may be levied in the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

The words “with the permission of the board” or “with the consent of the board,” as used in this article mean the express permission or consent of the board in each particular case, evidenced by resolution or order entered in its minutes, and granted upon application of the particular district, municipal corporation, or person desiring to obtain benefit of the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9005.

Before granting its permission for the acquiring of any right of way or easement or for the construction of any of the levees or other works mentioned in this article, the board may require the applicant to furnish and submit to the board complete and detailed plans and specifications and estimates of the cost thereof, and the board may in its order granting such permission designate a maximum limit of the amount of compensation to be so allowed therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9006.

In case the board determines that the ownership in fee of, instead of the right of way or easement over, any land required for use as a by-pass, overflow channel or basin, or for any part of the works of flood control to be carried out by the board, is necessary, or that the absolute ownership by the drainage district of any levees, cuts, canals, gates or other flood control works is necessary for the purposes of the district, then the board may require that title in fee and absolute ownership shall be conveyed to the drainage district before any compensation is allowed therefor pursuant to any of the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application of Compensation [9010. - 9021.]

9010.

Any compensation made to any municipal corporation, or person, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall be applied toward the payment of any assessment upon any tract of land assessed for any particular portion or project owned by the municipal corporation, or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9011.

The compensation made to any reclamation district, levee district or drainage district shall be applied and credited pro rata toward the payment of the balance remaining unpaid upon the assessments levied by the board against the land respectively situated within the reclamation district, levee district or drainage district, as part of the assessment out of which the compensation is to be made, based upon the total amount of the assessment charges against the lands in such reclamation district, levee district or drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

When the compensation applied pursuant to the provisions of the next preceding section exceeds the total amount of such credits upon the assessments upon the lands in the district, the excess shall be paid to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9013.

Whenever any reclamation district, levee district, or drainage district has warrants or a bond issue outstanding, or both, compensation made pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be paid directly to the district, and the compensation shall be applied and paid by the district, pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9014.

The compensation, or the proceeds thereof, when received by any reclamation district shall be paid or delivered by the board of trustees thereof to the county treasurer having the custody of the funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9015.

The county treasurer shall place the compensation paid to a reclamation district in the fund of the district out of which warrants are payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9016.

When compensation is received by any levee district, or drainage district, it shall be paid or delivered by the governing body thereof to the officer having the custody of the funds who shall place the compensation into the proper funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9017.

Any reclamation district, levee district, or drainage district, to which compensation is made, shall apply the same, or the proceeds thereof, to the payment of outstanding warrants of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9018.

If any reclamation district, levee district, or drainage district, has a bond issue outstanding, the board of trustees of the district shall direct the county treasurer, or officer having the custody of the funds of the district to apply any residue of such compensation after the payment of all outstanding warrants to the payment of interest on the bonds, or the principal of the bonds, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9019.

The county treasurer, or other officer having the custody of the funds of the district shall comply with such directions and transfer to the proper fund the necessary amount therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9020.

The county treasurer shall transfer sufficient funds from the general fund of the district to the bond and interest fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of Section 9018.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.

Any district, association or corporation may act under this article through a majority of its trustees or other governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exchange of Warrants [9025. - 9031.]

9025.

Any reclamation district that has sold or transferred any of its levees, or other reclamation or flood control works, easements, or property of any kind, to the drainage district, Sutter-Butte By-Pass Project No. 6, or of any other unit or project, and received warrants issued by the drainage district, or of Sutter-Butte By-Pass Project No. 6, or of any other unit or project, in exchange or payment therefor, or has received compensation from the drainage district, or Sutter-Butte By-Pass Project No. 6, or any other project thereof, for any levee, land, right of way, easement, or property of any kind, included in any of the plans adopted for controlling the flood waters of the Sacramento and San Joaquin rivers or their tributaries, to be carried out by the board, may exchange the warrants, or any portion of them, at par and accrued interest, for outstanding warrants issued by the reclamation district, at par and accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9026.

Any person, owning and holding any warrants of a reclamation district may apply to the board of trustees of the reclamation district for an exchange of the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9027.

Upon application made pursuant to the next preceding section the board of trustees of the reclamation district shall make the exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9028.

When any such exchange has been effected, the board of trustees of the reclamation district shall notify the county treasurer of the county in which the land, or the largest portion thereof, is situated, of the exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9029.

After the exchange has been effected, the warrants of the district shall be marked: “Surrendered for warrants of Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9030.

Proper entries of the surrender payment shall be made upon the books of the reclamation district, and also of the county treasurer of the county having the custody of the funds of the reclamation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9031.

If the warrants of the drainage district, or any of its units or projects, are at the time of the offer for exchange, in the hands and custody of the county treasurer of the county in which the land of the reclamation district, or of the largest portion thereof, is situated, the county treasurer of the county shall make the exchange on the terms, and in the manner provided by this chapter, whenever application is made to him for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessments [9035. - 9037.]

9035.

In any new, additional, or supplemental assessment of any reclamation district, the following shall be determined:

(a) The amount that should be assessed upon each tract of land according to the benefits that accrued to each tract of land from the expenditures represented by the warrants of the reclamation district that have been exchanged or surrendered for or paid by warrants of the drainage district or of Sutter-Butte By-Pass Project No. 6 or any other unit or project.

(b) The amount which should have been apportioned to each tract of land if the warrants of the drainage district or of Sutter-Butte By-Pass Project No. 6 or any other unit or project had been distributed to the tract of land or owner thereof proportionately to the percentage which the tract of land was assessed on the last assessment made by the reclamation district for the construction or acquisition of the levees, easements and property sold or transferred to the drainage district or any project thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9036.

If it appears that the amount that would have been assessed against any tract of land is greater than the amount to which the tract or owner thereof would have been entitled if the distribution had been made, the excess shall be assessed to the tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9037.

If the amount is less than the amount to which the tract or owner would have been entitled, the difference shall be paid to the owner of such tract by the reclamation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Land Subject to Lien of Assessment No. 6 [9040. - 9048.]

9040.

Any reclamation district, levee district or drainage district in which there are lands within the boundaries of the drainage district, which lands are subject to the lien of assessment number 6, or supplemental assessment number 6, levied in connection with project number 6, may present to any officer authorized by law to collect such assessments, warrants of the drainage district owned by it, and issued in connection with project number 6, in payment of the assessment on the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9041.

Any officer authorized by law to collect the assessments named in this article shall accept at the face value, plus accrued interest, the warrant or warrants tendered in payment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9042.

Payment in warrants shall be made on a pro rata basis on all lands in the district subject to such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9043.

It is discretionary with the board of trustees of any such reclamation district, levee district or drainage district to apply such warrants in payment of the assessment, or to apply the same as provided by Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9044.

If any such warrants are delivered by the board of trustees to the county treasurer having the custody of the funds of any district, under the provisions of Article 2 of this chapter or otherwise, the county treasurer, shall upon the request of the board of trustees return the warrants to the reclamation district, levee district or drainage district to the end that the board of trustees thereof may apply the same pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9045.

If the assessment, or any part of it has been paid in warrants by the district on any lands in the district by funds other than the funds of the district, the district shall deliver to the owner of such lands a warrant of the drainage district, levied in connection with project number 6, which in amount shall be equivalent to the same pro rata of the assessment on the lands as the district paid on other lands in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9046.

If it appears to the trustees of any such district that any such warrants owned by it will be paid from any assessment thereafter to be levied, and in their opinion 85 per cent, or more, of the moneys necessary to pay the warrants will be raised by an assessment on the lands within the district, the trustees may return the warrants to the board for cancellation and the warrants shall be canceled by the board and thereafter are inoperative and of no effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9047.

The trustees shall not return the warrants to the board for cancellation, without the consent of the board, if an assessment is then in process of being levied to pay the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9048.

Any reclamation, levee, irrigation, drainage or other district whatever, or any city, county, or political subdivision may make any contract, expend any of its money, or do anything which its governing body determines will directly or indirectly retire, reduce or remove from any of the land owned by it or held in trust for it by any county treasurer or other public officer, the lien of the Sutter-Butte By-pass Assessment No. 6 of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, or will make it possible for the Reclamation Board to order the release of the lien of and abandon any part of said assessment. The trustees of a reclamation district or a county treasurer or other public officer acting as trustee for a reclamation district or other district shall have the right to expend funds of the district, including rentals collected and moneys received by the trustees of the district from lease of or for use or occupation of any land referred to in Sections 51750 to 51757, inclusive, of this code, in such amounts that may be necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 450.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Reports [9110. - 9142.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [9110. - 9110.]

9110.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Fiscal year” has the same meaning as that set forth in Section 13290 of the Government Code.

(b) “Levee flood protection zone” means the area, as determined by the board or the department, that is protected by a project levee.

(c) “Local agency” means a local agency responsible for the maintenance of a project levee.

(d) “Maintenance” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 12878.

(e) “Project levee” means any levee that is part of the facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(f) “State Plan of Flood Control” has the same meaning as that set forth in Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See substantively similar Section 9110 in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Reports [9120. - 9122.]

9120.

(a) The department shall prepare and the board shall adopt a flood control system status report for the State Plan of Flood Control. This status report shall be updated periodically, as determined by the board. For the purposes of preparing the report, the department shall inspect the project levees and review available information to ascertain whether there are evident deficiencies.

(b) The status report shall include identification and description of each facility, an estimate of the risk of levee failure, a discussion of the inspection and review undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a), and appropriate recommendations regarding the levees and future work activities.

(c) On or before December 31, 2008, the board shall advise the Legislature, in writing, as to the board’s schedule of implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

9121.

(a) On or before September 1, 2010, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall provide written notice to each landowner whose property is determined to be entirely or partially within a levee flood protection zone.

(b) The notice shall include statements regarding all of the following:

(1) The property is located behind a levee.

(2) Levees reduce, but do not eliminate, the risk of flooding and are subject to catastrophic failure.

(3) If available, the level of flood risk as described in the flood control system status report described in Section 9120 and a levee flood protection zone map prepared in accordance with Section 9130.

(4) The state recommends that property owners in a levee flood protection zone obtain flood insurance, such as insurance provided by the Federal Emergency Management Agency through the National Flood Insurance Program.

(5) Information about purchasing federal flood insurance.

(6) The Internet address of the Web site that contains the information required by the flood management report described in Section 9141.

(7) Any other information determined by the department to be relevant.

(c) A county, with assistance from the department, shall annually provide to the department, by electronic means, lists of names and addresses of property owners in a levee flood protection zone located in that county.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the department may enter into contracts with private companies to provide the notices required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

9122.
